Washington statutes.
RCW 36.04.350

Wahkiakum county.

Wahkiakum county shall consist of the territory bounded as follows, to wit: Commencing at the southeast corner of Pacific county, on the Columbia river; thence up midchannel of said river to the southwest corner of Cowlitz county; thence north to the northwest corner of Cowlitz county; thence west on the northern boundary of township ten north to the line between ranges eight and nine west; thence south to the place of beginning.

[1879 p 213; 1869 p 295; 1867 p 48; 1854 p 474; RRS s 3959.]